languagetool-language-modules/gl/src/main/resources/org/languagetool/resource/gl/hunspell/gl_ES.dic
empedernir/658,659,858,859 po:verbo ts:transitiva / pronominal VOLG t pr
gorir/658,659,858,859 po:verbo ts:transitiva / pronominal VOLG t pr só formas arrizotónicas
guarir/658,659,858,859 po:verbo ts:transitiva / pronominal VOLG t pr só formas arrizotónicas
manir/858,859 po:verbo ts:pronominal VOLG pr
A/1001,1002,1003     # Amperio.
b/1001,1004     # Bit.
B/1001,1004     # Byte.
Bq/1001,1002,1003
C/1001,1002,1003     # Coulomb.
F/1001,1002,1003     # Farad.
g/1001,1002,1003     # Gramo.
Gy/1001,1002,1003
H/1001,1002,1003     # Henry.
Hz/1001,1002,1003     # Hercio.
J/1001,1002,1003     # Xulio.
K/1001,1002,1003     # Kelvin.
kat/1001,1002,1003
lm/1001,1002,1003     # Lumen.
lx/1001,1002,1003     # Lux.
m/1001,1002,1003     # Metro.
N/1001,1002,1003     # Newton.
Pa/1001,1002,1003     # Pascal.
s/1001,1002,1003     # Segundo.
S/1001,1002,1003     # Siemens.
sr/1001,1002,1003
Sv/1001,1002,1003     # Sievert.
T/1001,1002,1003     # Tesla.
V/1001,1002,1003     # Voltio.
W/1001,1002,1003     # Watt.
Wb/1001,1002,1003     # Wéber.
Ω/1001,1002,1003     # Ohm.
